Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-8] Provisional remedies. (a)
Before an arbitrator is appointed and is authorized and able to act, the court,
upon motion of a party to an arbitration proceeding and for good cause shown,
may enter an order for provisional remedies to protect the effectiveness of the
arbitration proceeding to the same extent and under the same conditions as if
the controversy were the subject of a civil action.

(b) After an arbitrator is appointed and is
authorized and able to act:

(1) The arbitrator may issue such orders for
provisional remedies, including interim awards, as the arbitrator finds
necessary to protect the effectiveness of the arbitration proceeding and to
promote the fair and expeditious resolution of the controversy, to the same
extent and under the same conditions as if the controversy were the subject of
a civil action; and

(2) A party to an arbitration proceeding may move the
court for a provisional remedy only if the matter is urgent and the arbitrator
is not able to act timely or the arbitrator cannot provide an adequate remedy.

(c) A party does not waive a right of
arbitration by making a motion under subsection (a) or (b). [L 2001, c 265, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next